Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.060

President.

The mayor shall be president of the commission. He or she shall preside at its meetings when present and shall oversee all departments and recommend to the commission, action on all matters requiring attention in any department.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2014; 1965 c 7 s 35.17.060. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 15, part; RRS s 9104, part.]